zh-CN: 包括调料瓶套装: 奶酪瓶; 油/醋瓶; 胡椒瓶; 盐瓶; 调料瓶; 支架; 牙签筒; 托盘; 其他
fr: Pièces incluses dans le set: Saupoudreuse à fromage; Huilier/vinaigrier; Poivrière; Salière; Saupoudreuse; Support; Support à cure-dents; Plateau; Autre
pl: W zestawie elementy zestawu shakera: Tarka do sera; Dozownik oleju / octu; Pieprzniczka; Solniczka; Solniczka / przyprawnik; Stojak; Pojemnik na wykałaczki; Tacka; Inne
da: Shakersætdele medfølger: Ostebøsse; Olie-/eddikedispenser; Peberbøsse; Saltbøsse; Krydderdåse; Stativ; Tandstikholder; Bakke; Andet
fi: Pakkaukseen sisältyvät shaker-setin osat: Juustosirotin; Öljy-/etikka-annostelija; Pippurisirotin; Suolasirotin; Maustesirotin; Jalusta; Hammastikkuteline; Tarjotin; Muu
el: Σετ αλατοπίπερου: Τυριέρα με τρύπες; Διανομέας λαδιού/ξυδιού; Πιπεριέρα; Αλατιέρα; Σέικερ μπαχαρικών; Βάση; Θήκη οδοντογλυφίδων; Δίσκος; Άλλο
tr: Ürüne dahil olan tuzluk-biberlik seti parçaları: Peynirlik; Yağ/sirke şişesi; Biberlik; Tuzluk; Baharatlık; Tabanlık; Kürdanlık; Tepsi; Diğer
sl-SI: Priloženi deli kompleta stresalnika: Posipalec za sir; Dozirnik za olje/kis; Poprnica; Solnica; Stresalnik za začimbe; Stojalo; Držalo za zobotrebce; Pladenj; Druga
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen shakerset: Kaashaker; Olie-/azijnstel; Peperstrooier; Zoutvaatje; Kruidenstrooier; Standaard; Tandenstokerhouder; Dienblad; Overig
es: Piezas del juego de coctelera incluidas: Quesera; Dispensador de aceite/vinagre; Salero; Salero; Agitador de especias; Soporte; Palilleto; Bandeja; Otros
lt-LT: Komplekte esančios plaktuvo rinkinio dalys: Sūrio barstytuvas; Aliejaus / acto dozatorius; Pipirinė; Druskinė; Prieskonių barstytuvas; Stovas; Dantų krapštukų laikiklis; Padėklas; Kita
pt-PT: Peças de conjuntos de frascos para especiarias incluídas: Dispensador de queijo ralado; Dispensador de óleo/vinagre; Pimenteiro; Saleiro; Saleiro; Suporte; Suporte para palitos; Bandeja; Outro
nb: Shaker-settdeler inkludert: Ostebøsse; Olje-/eddikdispenser; Pepperbøsser; Saltbøsser; Krydderbøsse; Stativ; Tannpirkerholder; Brett; Annet
vi: Các thành phần trong bộ bình lắc đi kèm: Bình lắc phô mai; Bình đựng dầu/giấm; Lọ tiêu; Lọ muối; Lọ rắc gia vị; Giá đỡ; Lọ đựng tăm; Khay; Khác
sv: Shaker-setdelar som ingår: Ostshaker; Olje-/vinägerdispenser; Pepparströare; Saltströare; Kryddströare; Stativ; tandpetarhållare; Bricka; Annat
zh-TW: 包含調味罐組件數: 起司罐; 油/醋罐; 胡椒罐; 鹽罐; 香料罐; 立架; 牙籤筒; 托盤; 其他
en: Shaker set pieces included: Cheese shaker; Oil/vinegar dispenser; Pepper shaker; Salt shaker; Spice shaker; Stand; Toothpick holder; Tray; Other
hu: Mellékelt shaker tartozékok: Sajtszóró; Olaj-/ecetadagoló; Borsszóró; Sószóró; Fűszerszóró; Állvány; Fogpiszkálótartó; Tálca; Egyéb
it: Articoli da shaker inclusi: Formaggera; Distributore di olio/aceto; Pepiera; Saliera; Spargispezie; Supporto; Portastuzzicadenti; Vassoio; Altro
bg-BG: Включени части за шейкър: Шейкър за сирене; Диспенсър за олио/оцет; Пиперник; Солница; Шейкър за подправки; Стойка; Поставка за клечки за зъби; Тава; Друго
hr-HR: Uključeni komadi kompleta soljenki: Posudica za posipanje sira; Dozator za ulje/ocat; Paprenka; Soljenka; Posuda za začine; Stalak; Držač za čačkalice; Pladanj; Ostalo
pt-BR: Peças incluídos do conjunto de saleiro e pimenteiro: Porta-queijo ralado; Dispensador de óleo/vinagre; Frasco de pimenta; Saleiro; Saleiro; Suporte; Porta-palitos; Bandeja; Outro
sk-SK: Vrátane súčastí sady šejkrov: Dávkovač na syr; Dávkovač oleja/octu; Korenička; Soľnička; Korenička; Stojan; Držiak na špáradlá; Podnos; Iné
ko: 셰이커 세트 포함 구성품: 치즈 셰이커; 오일/식초 디스펜서; 후추 셰이커; 소금 셰이커; 향신료통; 스탠드; 이쑤시개 홀더; 트레이; 기타
ru: Комплектация набора шейкера: Шейкер для сыра; Дозатор масла/уксуса; Перечница; Солонка; Шейкер для специй; Подставка; Подставка для зубочисток; Поднос; Другое
ja: シェーカーセット同梱: チーズシェイカー; オイル/ビネガーディスペンサー; こしょうシェーカー; 塩シェイカー; スパイスシェーカー; スタンド; つまようじホルダー; トレイ; その他
th: ส่วนประกอบต่างๆ ที่รวมอยู่ในชุดขวดเกลือพริกไทยนี้: ขวดใส่ชีส; ขวดรินน้ำมัน/น้ำส้มสายชู; ขวดใส่พริกไทย; ขวดเกลือ; กระปุกโรยเครื่องเทศ; แท่นวาง; ที่ใส่ไม้จิ้มฟัน; ถาด; อื่นๆ
de: Inbegriffene Streuer-Set-Teile: Käsestreuer; Öl-/Essigspender; Pfefferstreuer; Salzstreuer; Gewürzstreuer; Ständer; Zahnstocherbehälter; Tablett; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Piese din setul de shaker incluse: Recipient de presărat brânză; Dozator de ulei/oțet; Piperniță; Solniță; Agitator de condimente; Suport; Suport de scobitori; Tavă; Altele
cs: Obsažené kusy koktejlové sady: Dávkovač sýra; Dávkovač oleje/octa; Pepřenka; Slánka; Kořenka; Stojan; Stojan na párátka; Tácek; Jiné